Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-2624
State university, state college, or community college; duties.

On or before December 31 of each year, each state university, state college, and community college shall provide to the Department of Revenue a list of the qualifying children who received a tuition waiver pursuant to the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act during such year.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 102;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 85-2607;

Laws 2025, LB608, § 17.